Missouri, session 2026, SB1669.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Section 407.1338, RSMo, is repealed and two
new sections enacted in lieu thereof, to be known as sections
407.1321 and 407.1338, to read as follows:
407.1321. 1. A dealer, manufacturer, distributor, or
warrantor injured by another party's violation of sections
407.1320 to 407.1346 may bring a civil action in circuit
court to recover actual damages. The court shall award
attorney's fees and costs to any prevailing party in such
action. Venue for any civil action authorized by this
section shall exclusively be in the county in which the
dealership is located. In an action involving more than one
dealer, venue may be in any county in which a dealer who is
party to the action is located.
2. Before bringing suit under this section, the party
bringing suit for an alleged violation shall serve a written
demand for mediation upon the offending party. The
provisions of this subsection do not apply to a proceeding
for injunctive relief.
(1) The demand for mediation shall be served upon the
offending party via certified mail at the address stated
EXPLANATION-Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in this bill is not enacted
and is intended to be omitted in the law.

SB 1669 2
within the agreement between the parties or, if the address
is not contained in the agreement or the address is no
longer valid, the address on the offending party's license
filed with this state. In the event of a civil action
between two dealers, the demand shall be mailed to the
address on the dealer's license filed with this state.
(2) The demand for mediation shall contain a brief
statement of the dispute and the relief sought by the party
filing the demand.
(3) Within twenty days after the date a demand for
mediation is served, the parties shall mutually select an
independent mediator and meet with the mediator for the
purpose of attempting to resolve the dispute. The meeting
place shall be in this state in a location selected by the
mediator. The mediator may extend the date of the meeting
for good cause shown by either party or upon stipulation of
both parties.
(4) The service of a demand for mediation under this
subsection stays the time for the filing of any complaint,
petition, protest, or other action under sections 407.1320
to 407.1346 until representatives of both parties have met
with a mutually selected mediator for the purpose of
attempting to resolve the dispute. If a complaint,
petition, protest, or action is filed before that meeting,
the court shall enter an order suspending the proceeding or
action until the meeting has occurred and may, upon written
stipulation of all parties to the proceeding or action that
they wish to continue to mediate under this subsection,
enter an order suspending the proceeding or action for as
long a period as the court considers appropriate. A
suspension order issued under this subdivision may be
revoked by the court.

SB 1669 3
(5) The parties to the mediation shall bear their own
costs for attorney's fees and divide equally the cost of the
mediator.
3. In addition to the remedies provided in this
section and notwithstanding the existence of any additional
remedy at law, a dealer or manufacturer may apply to a
circuit court for the grant, upon a hearing and for cause
shown, of a temporary or permanent injunction, or both,
restraining any person from acting as a dealer,
manufacturer, or distributor without being properly licensed
pursuant to chapter 301, from violating or continuing to
violate any of the provisions of sections 407.1320 to
407.1346, or from failing or refusing to comply with the
requirements of sections 407.1320 to 407.1346. Such
injunction shall be issued without bond. A single act in
violation of any of the provisions of sections 407.1320 to
407.1346 is sufficient to authorize the issuance of an
injunction.
407.1338. 1. Each warrantor shall specify in writing
to each of its RV dealers, obligations, if any, for
preparation, delivery and warranty service on its products;
shall compensate the dealer for warranty service required of
the dealer by the warrantor; and shall provide the dealer
the schedule of compensation to be paid; and the time
allowances for the performance of such work and service. In
no event shall such schedule of compensation fail to include
reasonable compensation for diagnostic work as well as
warranty labor.
2. Time allowances for the diagnosis and performance
of warranty labor shall be reasonable for the work to be
performed. In the determination of what constitutes
reasonable compensation under this section, the principal

SB 1669 4
factors to be given consideration shall be the actual wage
rates being paid by the dealer, and the actual retail labor
rate being charged by the dealers in the community in which
the dealer is doing business. In no event shall such
compensation of a dealer for warranty labor be less than the
lowest retail labor rates actually charged by the dealer for
like nonwarranty labor as long as such rates are reasonable.
3. (1) The warrantor shall reimburse the dealer for
warranty parts at actual wholesale cost, plus a minimum
thirty-percent handling charge and the cost, if any, of
freight to return warranty parts to the warrantor.
(2) The warrantor shall supply parts and components
for warranty service in such quantities and within such
reasonable time as will enable the dealer to perform such
service without undue delay.
(3) If a warrantor fails to ship parts or components
necessary for warranty service within ten days of a dealer's
order, the dealer may obtain substantially equivalent parts
or components from other sources and shall, within thirty
days, be reimbursed by the warrantor at one hundred percent
of the cost paid by the dealer for any parts obtained from
another source.
4. Warranty audits of dealer records may be conducted
by the warrantor on a reasonable basis, and dealer claims
for warranty compensation shall not be denied except for
cause, such as performance of nonwarranty repairs, material
noncompliance with warrantors' published policies and
procedures, lack of material documentation, fraud, or
misrepresentation.
5. The dealer must submit warranty claims within
thirty days of completing work.

SB 1669 5
6. The dealer must notify the warrantor verbally or in
writing if the RV dealer is unable to perform material or
repetitive warranty repairs as soon as reasonably possible.
7. The warrantor must disapprove warranty claims in
writing within thirty days of the date of submission by the
dealer in the manner and form prescribed by the warrantor.
Claims not specifically disapproved in writing within thirty
days shall be construed to be approved and shall be paid
within forty-five days.
8. It is a violation of this chapter for any warrantor
to:
(1) Fail to perform any of its warranty obligations
with respect to its warranted product;
(2) Fail to include in written notices of factory
campaigns to vehicle owners and dealers the expected date by
which necessary parts and equipment, including tires and
chassis or chassis parts, will be available to dealers to
perform the campaign work. The manufacturer may ship parts
in quantity to the dealer to effect such campaign work, and
if such parts are in excess of the dealer's requirements,
the dealer may return unused parts to the manufacturer for
credit after completion of the campaign;
(3) Fail to compensate any of its RV dealers for
authorized repairs effected by such dealer of merchandise
damaged in manufacture or transit to the dealer, if the
carrier is designated by the manufacturer, factory branch,
distributor or distributor branch;
(4) Fail to compensate its RV dealers for authorized
warranty service in accordance with the schedule of
compensation provided the dealer pursuant to this section,
if performed in a timely and competent manner;

SB 1669 6
(5) Intentionally misrepresent in any way to
purchasers of RVs that warranties with respect to the
manufacture, performance or design of the vehicle are made
by the dealer either as warrantor or cowarrantor; [or]
(6) Require the dealer to make warranties to customers
in any manner related to the manufacture of the RV; or
(7) Fail to compensate its dealers for less than
seventy-five percent of a dealership's employee time spent
in traveling to and from mobile or other warranty repair
work performed away from the dealership location, provided
the dealership documents such travel time and submits a
claim to the warrantor within thirty days of completing the
work.
9. It is a violation of this chapter for any RV dealer
to:
(1) Fail to perform "predelivery inspection" (PDI)
functions, if required, in a competent and timely manner;
(2) Fail to perform warranty service work, authorized
by the warrantor, in a reasonably timely and competent
manner on any transient customer's vehicle whether sold by
that dealer or not;
(3) Misrepresent the terms of any warranty.
✓